North Dakota, session 69, HB1019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the parks
and recreation department for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the parks and recreation
department and for providing a grant to the International Peace Garden, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Subdivision 1.
PARKS AND RECREATION DEPARTMENT
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Administration $2,999,629 ($219,225) $2,780,404
Parks operations and maintenance 24,128,685 19,088,428 43,217,113
Recreation 11,465,641 855,335 12,320,976
New and vacant FTE pool 0 679,393 679,393
Total all funds $38,593,955 $20,403,931 $58,997,886
Less other funds 24,893,684 19,701,790 44,595,474
Total general fund $13,700,271 $702,141 $14,402,412
Full-time equivalent positions 65.00 11.00 76.00
Subdivision 2.
INTERNATIONAL PEACE GARDEN
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
International Peace Garden $1,126,329 $1,967,500 $3,093,829
Total all funds $1,126,329 $1,967,500 $3,093,829
Less other funds 0 1,967,500 1,967,500
Total general fund $1,126,329 $0 $1,126,329
Subdivision 3.
SECTION 1 TOTAL
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Grand total all funds $39,720,284 $22,371,431 $62,091,715
Less grand total other funds 24,893,684 21,669,290 46,562,974
Grand total general fund $14,826,600 $702,141 $15,528,741

H. B. NO. 1019 - PAGE 2
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Equipment $250,000 $250,000 $500,000
Deferred maintenance 0 12,500,000 12,500,000
State parks comfort stations 0 924,000 924,000
State parks technology enhancements 0 2,500,000 2,500,000
Lake Metigoshe state park sewer project 0 800,000 800,000
State parks matching grants 0 2,500,000 2,500,000
International Peace Garden music camp project 0 1,400,000 1,400,000
International Peace Garden sewer, water, and 0 250,000 250,000
irrigation master development plan
International Peace Garden conservatory project 0 317,500 317,500
Total $250,000 $21,441,500 $21,691,500
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The parks
and recreation department may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item
in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the
new and vacant FTE pool line item to other line items with salaries and wages in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. ADDITIONAL INCOME - APPROPRIATION - REPORTING. In addition to the
amounts appropriated in section 1 of this Act, any additional federal or special funds that become
available are appropriated to the parks and recreation department, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The department shall report any additional income under this section
to the office of management and budget and the legislative council.
SECTION 5. TRANSFER - GAME AND FISH DEPARTMENT TO PARKS AND RECREATION
DEPARTMENT - GAME AND FISH OPERATING FUND - BOAT RAMP OPERATION AND
MAINTENANCE. The sum of $122,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, included in the
park operations and maintenance line item in subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act, is from the game
and fish operating fund, or federal or other funds available to the game and fish department, which must
be transferred to the parks and recreation department for maintenance, operating, and extraordinary
repairs expenses relating to boat ramps at state parks, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 6. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND. The
other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes $19,941,500 from the strategic investment and
improvements fund, of which:
1. $12,500,000 is for deferred maintenance at state parks, $924,000 is for comfort stations at
state parks, $2,500,000 is for state parks technology enhancements, $800,000 is for a Lake
Metigoshe state park sewer infrastructure project, $1,250,000 is for state parks matching
funds, $1,400,000 is for an international music camp complex revitalization project at the
International Peace Garden, $250,000 is for a sewer, water, and irrigation master development
plan at the International Peace Garden, and $317,500 is for a cactus conservatory project at
the International Peace Garden.
2. The parks and recreation department may use funding appropriated for deferred maintenance
at state parks for the purchase of buildings to replace currently owned buildings that are
beyond feasible repair.

H. B. NO. 1019 - PAGE 3
3. The parks and recreation department shall use the $800,000 identified in this section for the
Lake Metigoshe state park sewer infrastructure project to provide a grant to a local sewer
district to replace or repair the sewer infrastructure system servicing Lake Metigoshe state
park and surrounding areas. Grant funding awarded under this section may not exceed twenty
percent of the total project cost to replace or repair the sewer infrastructure system.
SECTION 7. INTERNATIONAL PEACE GARDEN. The International Peace Garden line item in
section 1 of this Act includes $1,967,500 for projects at the International Peace Garden, which the parks
and recreation department may provide only to the extent the funds are matched by the province of
Manitoba at a value equal to the United States dollar exchange rate on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 8. A new section to chapter 55-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Creation and naming of state parks.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a state agency or official may not create a new state
park or rename an existing state park without prior approval from the legislative assembly.
SECTION 9. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS. The following appropriations are
not subject to the provisions of section 54-44.1-11 and may be continued into the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027:
1. The sum of $634,126 appropriated from the parks and recreation fund for extraordinary
repairs in subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 44 of the 2019 Session Laws, continued into
the 2021-23 biennium in section 13 of chapter 19 of the 2021 Session Laws, and continued
into the 2023-25 biennium in section 9 of chapter 51 of the 2023 Session Laws.
2. The sum of $200,000 appropriated from the general fund for trail lease renewals and
construction or purchasing trail easements in subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 19 of the
2021 Session Laws and continued into the 2023-25 biennium in section 9 of chapter 51 of the
2023 Session Laws.
3. The sum of $50,000 appropriated from the general fund for the Fort Abraham Lincoln
viewshed lease in subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 19 of the 2021 Session Laws and
continued into the 2023-25 biennium in section 9 of chapter 51 of the 2023 Session Laws for
plantings to improve the viewshed.
4. The sum of $10,000,000 appropriated from the federal state fiscal recovery fund for deferred
maintenance and capital projects in subsection 9 of section 1 of chapter 550 of the 2021
Special Session Session Laws and continued into the 2023-25 biennium in section 9 of
chapter 51 of the 2023 Session Laws.
5. The sum of $5,000,000 appropriated from the state fiscal recovery fund for the grants to local
park districts to renovate and upgrade existing facilities in subsection 5 of section 1 of
chapter 550 of the 2021 Special Session Session Laws and continued into the 2023-25
biennium in section 9 of chapter 51 of the 2023 Session Laws.
6. The sum of $1,632,800 appropriated from the state fiscal recovery fund and local matching
funds for capital project improvements at state parks, subject to the parks and recreation
department obtaining matching funds from nonstate sources for each project on a
dollar-for-dollar basis in section 7 of chapter 19 of the 2021 Session Laws as amended in
section 4 of chapter 548 of the 2021 Special Session Session Laws and continued into the
2023-25 biennium in section 9 of chapter 51 of the 2023 Session Laws.
7. The sum of $7,900,000 appropriated from the state fiscal recovery fund for the deferred
maintenance and capital projects in section 6 of chapter 19 of the 2021 Session Laws as

H. B. NO. 1019 - PAGE 4
amended by section 3 of chapter 548 of the 2021 Special Session Session Laws and
continued into the 2023-25 biennium in section 9 of chapter 51 of the 2023 Session Laws.
8. The sum of $800,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund for a
pavilion construction project at the International Peace Garden in subdivision 1 of section 1 of
chapter 51 of the 2023 Session Laws.
9. The sum of $10,000,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund
for deferred maintenance and capital projects in subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 51 of the
2023 Session Laws.
10. The sum of $2,400,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund for
a cabin construction project in subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 51 of the 2023 Session
Laws.
11. The sum of $250,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund for a
Lake Metigoshe reimagined project in subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 51 of the 2023
Session Laws.
12. The sum of $6,000,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund for
city, county, and tribal park system grants in subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 51 of the
2023 Session Laws.
13. The sum of $70,000,000 appropriated from special funds derived from a Bank of North Dakota
line of credit for the Theodore Roosevelt presidential library project in subdivision 1 of
section 1 of chapter 51 of the 2023 Session Laws, which may be used only for providing
reimbursement of construction costs associated with building the Theodore Roosevelt
presidential library, including fixtures, furnishings, exhibit structures, supplies, and materials.
14. The sum of $6,000,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund for
a Pembina Gorge campground project in subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 51 of the 2023
Session Laws.
15. The sum of $3,000,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund
and matching funds for state park matching grants subject to the parks and recreation
department obtaining matching funds from nonstate sources for each project on a
dollar-for-dollar basis in subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 51 of the 2023 Session Laws.
16. The sum of $2,000,000 appropriated from grant funds from the state water commission for
sovereign land grants in subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 51 of the 2023 Session Laws.
The department may use up to $450,000 of this funding for deferred maintenance projects at
state parks and for the purchase of equipment. All other remaining funding under this
subsection must be used for sovereign land grants.

H. B. NO. 1019 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1019.
House Vote: Yeas 76 Nays 13 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 34 Nays 12 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State